Vermont statutes. Title 5 Aeronautics and Surface Transportation Generally
Subchapter 2. Restrictions

§ 421.
Minimum altitudes for operation.

Except when necessary for take-off or landing, or by special permission of the Agency, no person shall operate an aircraft below the following altitudes:

An altitude which will permit, in the event of the failure of a power unit, an emergency landing without undue hazard to persons or property on the surface.

Over congested areas of cities or towns, or over an open-air assembly of persons, an altitude of 1,000 feet above the highest obstacle within a horizontal radius of 2,000 feet from the aircraft.

An altitude of 500 feet above the surface, except over open water or sparsely populated areas. In this event, the aircraft shall not be operated closer than 500 feet to any person, vessel, vehicle, or structure.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 422.
Penalty for violation.

A person who violates a provision of section 421 of this title shall be fined not more than $500.00 or imprisoned for not more than 90 days, or both.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 423.
Diversion from normal flight; careless operation.

An aircraft shall not be diverted from a normal flight nor engage in acrobatic maneuvers nor be so operated as to diminish the stability and safety of the aircraft when the aircraft is over a thickly settled portion of a town, city, or village or over a place where a celebration, game, or contest is being held, or over a place where a failure of the aircraft might cause personal injury or damage to property, or under 1,500 feet, unless by special permission of the Federal Aviation Administration and the Agency.

No person shall operate an aircraft in a careless or negligent manner so as to endanger the life or property of others.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 424.
Repealed.
1997, No. 150 (Adj. Sess.), § 4(4).

§ 425.
Killing birds or animals.

While in flight within this State, an airman or passenger who intentionally kills or attempts to kill a bird or animal shall be fined not more than $50.00 or imprisoned for not more than 60 days, or both.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 426.
Helicopters; aircraft engaged in crop spraying or dusting.

The Agency may adopt rules necessary to regulate the operation in flight of helicopters, or of aircraft engaged in crop spraying or dusting. The provisions of section 421 of this title shall not apply to these rules.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2015, No. 23

, § 69.

§ 427.
Operating under influence of liquor or drugs; penalty; revocation of right.

No person shall operate or attempt to operate an aircraft or serve as a member of a crew while under the influence of alcohol or any habit-forming drug.

A person who violates a provision of subsection (a) of this section shall be fined not less than $100.00 nor more than $1,000.00, or, if he or she is the operator of the aircraft, may be imprisoned for not more than two years, or both.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1997, No. 150

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(c);

2017, No. 83

, § 161(1).

§ 428.
Reporting an aircraft.

A person who demands money or any other thing of value or a benefit for himself or another as a condition for disclosing the location of an aircraft which has crashed, crash-landed, or is missing shall be fined not more than $1,000.00 or imprisoned not more than 90 days, or both.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.